Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-185, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-185. Charter schools; financing; civil penalties; transportation; definition A. A school district is not financially responsible for any charter school that is sponsored by the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents, a community college district or a group of community college districts. B. Financial provisions for a charter school that is sponsored by the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university, a community college district or a group of community college districts are as follows: 1. The charter school shall calculate a base support level as prescribed in section 15-943, except that: (a) Section 15-941 does not apply to these charter schools. (b) The small school weights prescribed in section 15-943, paragraph 1 apply if a charter holder holds one charter for one or more school sites and the average daily membership for the school sites are combined for the calculation of the small school weight. The small school weight shall not be applied individually to a charter holder if one or more of the following conditions exist and the combined average daily membership derived from the following conditions is greater than six hundred: (i) The organizational structure or management agreement of the charter holder requires the charter holder or charter school to contract with a specific management company. (ii) The governing body of the charter holder has identical membership to another charter holder in this state. (iii) The charter holder is a subsidiary of a corporation that has other subsidiaries that are charter holders in this state. (iv) The charter holder holds more than one charter in this state. (c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of this paragraph, for fiscal years 2015-2016 and 2016-2017, the department of education shall reduce by thirty-three percent the amount provided by the small school weight for charter schools prescribed in subdivision (b) of this paragraph. 2. Notwithstanding paragraph 1 of this subsection, the student count shall be determined initially using an estimated student count based on actual registration of pupils before the beginning of the school year. Notwithstanding section 15-1042, subsection F, student level data submitted to the department may be used to determine estimated student counts. After the first forty days, one hundred days or two hundred days in session, as applicable, the charter school shall revise the student count to be equal to the actual average daily membership, as defined in section 15-901, of the charter school. Before the fortieth day, one hundredth day or two hundredth day in session, as applicable, the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, the sponsoring university, the sponsoring community college district or the sponsoring group of community college districts may require a charter school to report periodically regarding pupil enrollment and attendance, and the department of education may revise its computation of equalization assistance based on the report. A charter school shall revise its student count, base support level and charter additional assistance before May 15. A charter school that overestimated its student count shall revise its budget before May 15. A charter school that underestimated its student count may revise its budget before May 15. 3. A charter school may use section 15-855 for the purposes of this section. The charter school and the department of education shall prescribe procedures for determining average daily membership. 4. Equalization assistance for the charter school shall be determined by adding the amount of the base support level and charter additional assistance. The amount of the charter additional assistance is $2,131.90 $2,174.54 per student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through eight and $2,484.69 $2,534.38 per student count in grades nine through twelve. 5. The state board of education shall apportion state aid from the appropriations made for such purposes to the state treasurer for disbursement to the charter schools in each county in an amount as determined by this paragraph. The apportionments shall be made as prescribed in section 15-973, subsection B. 6. The charter school shall not charge tuition for pupils who reside in this state, levy taxes or issue bonds. A charter school may admit pupils who are not residents of this state and shall charge tuition for those pupils in the same manner prescribed in section 15-823. 7. Not later than noon on the day preceding each apportionment date established pursuant to paragraph 5 of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction shall furnish to the state treasurer an abstract of the apportionment and shall certify the apportionment to the department of administration, which shall draw its warrant in favor of the charter schools for the amount apportioned. C. If a pupil is enrolled in both a charter school and a public school that is not a charter school, the sum of the daily membership, which includes enrollment as prescribed in section 15-901, subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivisions (a) and (b) and daily attendance as prescribed in section 15-901, subsection A, paragraph 5, for that pupil in the school district and the charter school shall not exceed 1.0. If a pupil is enrolled in both a charter school and a public school that is not a charter school, the department of education shall direct the average daily membership to the school with the most recent enrollment date. On validation of actual enrollment in both a charter school and a public school that is not a charter school and if the sum of the daily membership or daily attendance for that pupil is greater than 1.0, the sum shall be reduced to 1.0 and shall be apportioned between the public school and the charter school based on the percentage of total time that the pupil is enrolled or in attendance in the public school and the charter school. The uniform system of financial records shall include guidelines to apportion the pupil enrollment and attendance as provided in this section. D. Charter schools are allowed to accept grants and gifts to supplement their state funding, but it is not the intent of the charter school law to require taxpayers to pay twice to educate the same pupils. The base support level for a charter school or for a school district sponsoring a charter school shall be reduced by an amount equal to the total amount of monies received by a charter school from a federal or state agency if the federal or state monies are intended for the basic maintenance and operations of the school. The superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the amount of the reduction for the budget year and shall revise the reduction to reflect the actual amount before May 15 of the current year. If the reduction results in a negative amount, the negative amount shall be used in computing all budget limits and equalization assistance, except that: 1. Equalization assistance shall not be less than zero. 2. For a charter school sponsored by the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university, a community college district or a group of community college districts, the total of the base support level and the charter additional assistance shall not be less than zero. E. If a charter school was a district public school in the prior year and sponsored by the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university, a community college district or a group of community college districts, the reduction in subsection D of this section applies. The reduction to the base support level of the charter school shall equal the sum of the base support level and the charter additional assistance received in the current year for those pupils who were enrolled in the traditional public school in the prior year and are now enrolled in the charter school in the current year. F. Equalization assistance for charter schools shall be provided as a single amount based on average daily membership without categorical distinctions between maintenance and operations or capital. G. At the request of a charter school, the county school superintendent of the county where the charter school is located may provide the same educational services to the charter school as prescribed in section 15-308, subsection A. The county school superintendent may charge a fee to recover costs for providing educational services to charter schools. H. If the sponsor of the charter school determines at a public meeting that the charter school is not in compliance with federal law, with the laws of this state or with its charter, the sponsor of a charter school may submit a request to the department of education to withhold up to ten percent of the monthly apportionment of state aid that would otherwise be due the charter school. The department shall adjust the charter school's apportionment accordingly. The sponsor shall provide written notice to the charter school at least seventy-two hours before the meeting and shall allow the charter school to respond to the allegations of noncompliance at the meeting before the sponsor makes a final determination to notify the department of education of noncompliance. The charter school shall submit a corrective action plan to the sponsor on a date specified by the sponsor at the meeting. The corrective action plan shall be designed to correct deficiencies at the charter school and to ensure that the charter school promptly returns to compliance. When the sponsor determines that the charter school is in compliance, the department shall restore the full amount of state aid payments to the charter school. I. In addition to the withholding of state aid payments pursuant to subsection H of this section, the sponsor of a charter school may impose a civil penalty of $1,000 per occurrence if a charter school fails to comply with the fingerprinting requirements prescribed in section 15-183, subsection C or section 15-512. The sponsor of a charter school shall not impose a civil penalty if it is the first time the charter school is out of compliance with the fingerprinting requirements and if the charter school provides proof within forty-eight hours after written notification that an application for the appropriate fingerprint check has been received by the department of public safety. The sponsor of the charter school shall obtain proof that the charter school has been notified, and the notification shall identify the date of the deadline and shall be signed by both parties. The sponsor of a charter school shall automatically impose a civil penalty of $1,000 per occurrence if the sponsor determines that the charter school subsequently violates the fingerprinting requirements. Civil penalties pursuant to this subsection shall be assessed by requesting the department of education to reduce the amount of state aid that the charter school would otherwise receive by an amount equal to the civil penalty. The amount of state aid withheld shall revert to the state general fund at the end of the fiscal year. J. A charter school may receive and spend monies distributed by the department of education pursuant to section 42-5029, subsection E, section 42-5029.02, subsection A and section 37-521, subsection B. K. If a school district transports or contracts to transport pupils to the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind during any fiscal year, the school district may transport or contract with a charter school to transport sensory impaired pupils during that same fiscal year to a charter school if requested by the parent of the pupil and if the distance from the pupil's place of actual residence within the school district to the charter school is less than the distance from the pupil's place of actual residence within the school district to the campus of the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind. L. Notwithstanding any other law, a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents, a community college district or a group of community college districts shall not include any student in the student count of the university, community college district or group of community college districts for state funding purposes if that student is enrolled in and attending a charter school sponsored by the university, community college district or group of community college districts. M. The governing body of a charter school shall transmit a copy of its proposed budget or the summary of the proposed budget and a notice of the public hearing to the department of education for posting on the department of education's website not later than ten days before the hearing and meeting. If the charter school maintains a website, the charter school governing body shall post on its website a copy of its proposed budget or the summary of the proposed budget and a notice of the public hearing. N. The governing body of a charter school shall collaborate with the private organization that is approved by the state board of education pursuant to section 15-792.02 to provide approved board examination systems for the charter school. O. If allowed by federal law, a charter school may opt out of federal grant opportunities if the charter holder or the appropriate governing body of the charter school determines that the federal requirements impose unduly burdensome reporting requirements. P. For the purposes of this section, "monies intended for the basic maintenance and operations of the school" means monies intended to provide support for the educational program of the school, except that it does not include supplemental assistance for a specific purpose or title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 monies. The auditor general shall determine which federal or state monies meet this definition. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-901. Definitions A. In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Average daily membership" means the total enrollment of fractional students and full-time students, minus withdrawals, of each school day through the first one hundred days or two hundred days in session, as applicable, for the current year. For the purposes of this paragraph, "withdrawals" means students who are formally withdrawn from schools or students who are absent for ten consecutive school days, except for excused absences identified by the department of education. For computation purposes, a student who is absent for nine or fewer consecutive school days, including the last day of the school year, is not a withdrawal and may not be subtracted from the total enrollment of fractional students and full-time students. For the purposes of this section, school districts and charter schools shall report student absence data to the department of education at least once every sixty days in session. For computation purposes, the effective date of withdrawal shall be retroactive to the last day of actual attendance of the student or excused absence. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subsection in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (a) "Fractional student" means: (i) For common schools, a preschool child who is enrolled in a program for preschool children with disabilities of at least three hundred sixty minutes each week that meets at least two hundred sixteen hours over the minimum number of days or a kindergarten student who is at least five years of age before January 1 of the school year and enrolled in a school kindergarten program that meets at least three hundred fifty-six hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. In computing the average daily membership, preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten students shall be counted as one-half of a full-time student. For common schools, a part-time student is a student enrolled for less than the total time for a full-time student as defined in this section. A part-time common school student shall be counted as one-fourth, one-half or three-fourths of a full-time student if the student is enrolled in an instructional program that is at least one-fourth, one-half or three-fourths of the time a full-time student is enrolled as defined in subdivision (b) of this paragraph. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a common school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (ii) For high schools, a part-time student who is enrolled in less than four subjects that count toward graduation as defined by the state board of education, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, in a recognized high school. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.75 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of three subjects that meet at least five hundred forty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.5 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of two subjects that meet at least three hundred sixty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.25 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of one subject that meets at least one hundred eighty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a high school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (b) "Full-time student" means: (i) For common schools, a student who is at least six years of age before January 1 of a school year, who has not graduated from the highest grade taught in the school district and who is regularly enrolled in a course of study required by the state board of education. First, second and third grade students or ungraded group B children with disabilities who are at least five, but under six, years of age by September 1 must be enrolled in an instructional program that meets for a total of at least seven hundred twelve hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth grade students must be enrolled in an instructional program that meets for a total of at least eight hundred ninety hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section, including the equivalent number of instructional hours for schools that operate on a one hundred forty-four-day school year. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a common school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (ii) For high schools, a student who has not graduated from the highest grade taught in the school district and who is enrolled in at least an instructional program of four or more subjects that count toward graduation as defined by the state board of education, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, that meets for a total of at least seven hundred twenty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section in a recognized high school. A full-time student shall not be counted more than once for computation of average daily membership. The average daily membership of a full-time high school student shall be 1.0 if the student is enrolled in at least four subjects that meet at least seven hundred twenty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the equivalent instructional hours prescribed in this section. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a high school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (iii) If a child who has not reached five years of age before September 1 of the current school year is admitted to kindergarten and repeats kindergarten in the following school year, a school district or charter school is not eligible to receive basic state aid on behalf of that child during the child's second year of kindergarten. If a child who has not reached five years of age before September 1 of the current school year is admitted to kindergarten but does not remain enrolled, a school district or charter school may receive a portion of basic state aid on behalf of that child in the subsequent year. A school district or charter school may charge tuition for any child who is ineligible for basic state aid pursuant to this item. (iv) Except as otherwise provided by law, for a full-time high school student who is concurrently enrolled in two school districts or two charter schools, the average daily membership shall not exceed 1.0. (v) Except as otherwise provided by law, for any student who is concurrently enrolled in a school district and a charter school, the average daily membership shall be apportioned between the school district and the charter school and shall not exceed 1.0. The apportionment shall be based on the percentage of total time that the student is enrolled in or in attendance at the school district and the charter school. (vi) Except as otherwise provided by law, for any student who is concurrently enrolled, pursuant to section 15-808, in a school district and Arizona online instruction or a charter school and Arizona online instruction, the average daily membership shall be apportioned between the school district and Arizona online instruction or the charter school and Arizona online instruction and shall not exceed 1.0. The apportionment shall be based on the percentage of total time that the student is enrolled in or in attendance at the school district and Arizona online instruction or the charter school and Arizona online instruction. (vii) For homebound or hospitalized, a student receiving at least four hours of instruction per week. (c) "Regular school day" means the regularly scheduled class periods intended for instructional purposes. Instructional purposes may include core subjects, elective subjects, lunch, study halls, music instruction and other classes that advance the academic instruction of pupils. Instructional purposes do not include athletic practices or extracurricular clubs and activities. 2. "Budget year" means the fiscal year for which the school district is budgeting and that immediately follows the current year. 3. "Common school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students in programs for preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten programs and either: (a) Grades one through eight. (b) Grades one through nine pursuant to section 15-447.01. 4. "Current year" means the fiscal year in which a school district is operating. 5. "Daily attendance" means: (a) For common schools, days in which a pupil: (i) Of a kindergarten program or ungraded, but not group B children with disabilities, who is at least five, but under six, years of age by September 1 attends at least three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day. If the total instruction time scheduled for the year is at least three hundred fifty-six hours but is less than seven hundred twelve hours, such attendance shall be counted as one-half day of attendance. If the instructional time scheduled for the year is at least six hundred ninety-two hours, "daily attendance" means days in which a pupil attends at least one-half of the instructional time scheduled for the day. Such attendance shall be counted as one-half day of attendance. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (ii) Of the first, second or third grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (iii) Of the fourth, fifth or sixth grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day, except as provided in section 15-797. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (iv) Of the seventh or eighth grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day, except as provided in section 15-797. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (b) For common schools, the attendance of a pupil at three-quarters or less of the instructional time scheduled for the day shall be counted as follows, except as provided in section 15-797 and except that attendance for a fractional student shall not exceed the pupil's fractional membership: (i) If attendance for all pupils in the school is based on quarter days, the attendance of a pupil shall be counted as one-fourth of a day's attendance for each one-fourth of full-time instructional time attended. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (ii) If attendance for all pupils in the school is based on half days, the attendance of at least three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day shall be counted as a full day's attendance and attendance at a minimum of one-half but less than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day equals one-half day of attendance. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (c) For common schools, the attendance of a preschool child with disabilities shall be counted as one-fourth day's attendance for each thirty-six minutes of attendance, except as provided in paragraph 1, subdivision (a), item (i) of this subsection for children with disabilities up to a maximum of three hundred sixty minutes each week. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (d) For high schools, the attendance of a pupil shall not be counted as a full day unless the pupil is actually and physically in attendance and enrolled in and carrying four subjects, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, that count toward graduation in a recognized high school except as provided in section 15-797 and subdivision (e) of this paragraph. Attendance of a pupil carrying less than the load prescribed shall be prorated. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (e) For high schools, the attendance of a pupil may be counted as one-fourth of a day's attendance for each sixty minutes of instructional time in a subject that counts toward graduation, except that attendance for a pupil shall not exceed the pupil's full or fractional membership. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (f) For homebound or hospitalized, a full day of attendance may be counted for each day during a week in which the student receives at least four hours of instruction. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (g) For school districts that maintain school for an approved year-round school year operation, attendance shall be based on a computation, as prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction, of the one hundred eighty days' equivalency or two hundred days' equivalency, as applicable, of instructional time as approved by the superintendent of public instruction during which each pupil is enrolled. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. 6. "Daily route mileage" means the sum of: (a) The total number of miles driven daily by all buses of a school district while transporting eligible students from their residence to the school of attendance and from the school of attendance to their residence on scheduled routes approved by the superintendent of public instruction. (b) The total number of miles driven daily on routes approved by the superintendent of public instruction for which a private party, a political subdivision or a common or a contract carrier is reimbursed for bringing an eligible student from the place of the student's residence to a school transportation pickup point or to the school of attendance and from the school transportation scheduled return point or from the school of attendance to the student's residence. Daily route mileage includes the total number of miles necessary to drive to transport eligible students from and to their residence as provided in this paragraph. 7. "District support level" means the base support level plus the transportation support level. 8. "Eligible students" means: (a) Students who are transported by or for a school district and who qualify as full-time students or fractional students, except students for whom transportation is paid by another school district or a county school superintendent, and: (i) For common school students, whose place of actual residence within the school district is more than one mile from the school facility of attendance or students who are admitted pursuant to section 15-816.01 and who meet the economic eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches and whose actual place of residence outside the school district boundaries is more than one mile from the school facility of attendance. (ii) For high school students, whose place of actual residence within the school district is more than one and one-half miles from the school facility of attendance or students who are admitted pursuant to section 15-816.01 and who meet the economic eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches and whose actual place of residence outside the school district boundaries is more than one and one-half miles from the school facility of attendance. (b) Kindergarten students, for purposes of computing the number of eligible students under subdivision (a), item (i) of this paragraph, shall be counted as full-time students, notwithstanding any other provision of law. (c) Children with disabilities, as defined by section 15-761, who are transported by or for the school district or who are admitted pursuant to chapter 8, article 1.1 of this title and who qualify as full-time students or fractional students regardless of location or residence within the school district or children with disabilities whose transportation is required by the pupil's individualized education program. (d) Students whose residence is outside the school district and who are transported within the school district on the same basis as students who reside in the school district. 9. "Enrolled" or "enrollment" means that a pupil is currently registered in the school district. 10. "GDP price deflator" means the average of the four implicit price deflators for the gross domestic product reported by the United States department of commerce for the four quarters of the calendar year. 11. "High school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students for grades nine through twelve or that portion of the budget of a common school district that is allocated to teaching high school subjects with permission of the state board of education. 12. "Instructional hours" or "instructional time" means hours or time spent pursuant to an instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. 13. "Revenue control limit" means the base revenue control limit plus the transportation revenue control limit. 14. "Student count" means average daily membership as prescribed in this subsection for the fiscal year before the current year, except that for the purpose of budget preparation student count means average daily membership as prescribed in this subsection for the current year. 15. "Submit electronically" means submitted in a format and in a manner prescribed by the department of education. 16. "Total bus mileage" means the total number of miles driven by all buses of a school district during the school year. 17. "Total students transported" means all eligible students transported from their place of residence to a school transportation pickup point or to the school of attendance and from the school of attendance or from the school transportation scheduled return point to their place of residence. 18. "Unified school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students in programs for preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. B. In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Base" means the revenue level per student count specified by the legislature. 2. "Base level" means the following amounts plus the percentage increase to the base level as provided in section 15-902.04: (a) For fiscal year 2023-2024, $4,914.71. (b) (a) For fiscal year 2024-2025, $5,013.00. (c) (b) For fiscal year 2025-2026, $5,113.26. (c) For fiscal year 2026-2027, $5,215.53. 3. "Base revenue control limit" means the base revenue control limit computed as provided in section 15-944. 4. "Base support level" means the base support level as provided in section 15-943. 5. "Certified teacher" means a person who is certified as a teacher pursuant to the rules adopted by the state board of education, who renders direct and personal services to schoolchildren in the form of instruction related to the school district's educational course of study and who is paid from the maintenance and operation section of the budget. 6. "DD" means programs for children with developmental delays who are at least three years of age but under ten years of age. A preschool child who is categorized under this paragraph is not eligible to receive funding pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (b). 7. "ED, MIID, SLD, SLI and OHI" means programs for children with emotional disabilities, mild intellectual disabilities, a specific learning disability, a speech/language impairment and other health impairments. A preschool child who is categorized as SLI under this paragraph is not eligible to receive funding pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (b). 8. "ED-P" means programs for children with emotional disabilities who are enrolled in private special education programs as prescribed in section 15-765, subsection D, paragraph 1 or in an intensive school district program as provided in section 15-765, subsection D, paragraph 2. 9. "ELL" means English learners who do not speak English or whose native language is not English, who are not currently able to perform ordinary classroom work in English and who are enrolled in an English language education program pursuant to sections 15-751, 15-752 and 15-753. 10. "FRPL" means students who meet the eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches, or an equivalent measure recognized for participating in the federal free and reduced-price lunch program and other school programs dependent on a poverty measure, including the community eligibility provision for which free and reduced-price lunch data is not available. 11. "Full-time equivalent certified teacher" or "FTE certified teacher" means for a certified teacher the following: (a) If employed full time full-time as defined in section 15-501, 1.00. (b) If employed less than full time full-time, multiply 1.00 by the percentage of a full school day, or its equivalent, or a full class load, or its equivalent, for which the teacher is employed as determined by the governing board. 12. "G" means educational programs for gifted pupils who score at or above the ninety-seventh percentile, based on national norms, on a test adopted by the state board of education. 13. "Group A" means educational programs for career exploration, a specific learning disability, an emotional disability, a mild intellectual disability, remedial education, a speech/language impairment, developmental delay, homebound pupils, bilingual pupils and pupils with other health impairments. 14. "Group B" means educational improvements for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three, educational programs for autism, a hearing impairment, a moderate intellectual disability, multiple disabilities, multiple disabilities with severe sensory impairment, orthopedic impairments, preschool severe delay, a severe intellectual disability and emotional disabilities for school age pupils enrolled in private special education programs or in school district programs for children with severe disabilities or visual impairment, English learners enrolled in a program to promote English language proficiency pursuant to section 15-752 and students who meet the eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches, or an equivalent measure recognized for participating in the federal free and reduced-price lunch program and other school programs dependent on a poverty measure, including the community eligibility provision for which free and reduced-price lunch data is not available. 15. "HI" means programs for pupils with hearing impairment. 16. "Homebound" or "hospitalized" means a pupil who is capable of profiting from academic instruction but is unable to attend school due to illness, disease, accident or other health conditions, who has been examined by a competent medical doctor and who is certified by that doctor as being unable to attend regular classes for a period of not less than at least three school months or a pupil who is capable of profiting from academic instruction but is unable to attend school regularly due to chronic or acute health problems, who has been examined by a competent medical doctor and who is certified by that doctor as being unable to attend regular classes for intermittent periods of time totaling three school months during a school year. The medical certification shall state the general medical condition, such as illness, disease or chronic health condition, that is the reason that the pupil is unable to attend school. Homebound or hospitalized includes a student who is unable to attend school for a period of less than three months due to a pregnancy if a competent medical doctor, after an examination, certifies that the student is unable to attend regular classes due to risk to the pregnancy or to the student's health. 17. "K-3" means kindergarten programs and grades one through three. 18. "K-3 reading" means reading programs for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one, two and three. 19. "MD-R, A-R and SID-R" means resource programs for pupils with multiple disabilities, autism and severe intellectual disability. 20. "MD-SC, A-SC and SID-SC" means self-contained programs for pupils with multiple disabilities, autism and severe intellectual disability. 21. "MD-SSI" means a program for pupils with multiple disabilities with severe sensory impairment. 22. "MOID" means programs for pupils with moderate intellectual disability. 23. "OI-R" means a resource program for pupils with orthopedic impairments. 24. "OI-SC" means a self-contained program for pupils with orthopedic impairments. 25. "PSD" means preschool programs for children with disabilities as provided in section 15-771. 26. "P-SD" means programs for children who meet the definition of preschool severe delay as provided in section 15-771. 27. "Qualifying tax rate" means the qualifying tax rate specified in section 15-971 applied to the assessed valuation used for primary property taxes. 28. "Small isolated school district" means a school district that meets all of the following: (a) Has a student count of fewer than six hundred in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or grades nine through twelve. (b) Contains no school that is fewer than thirty miles by the most reasonable route from another school, or, if road conditions and terrain make the driving slow or hazardous, fifteen miles from another school that teaches one or more of the same grades and is operated by another school district in this state. (c) Is designated as a small isolated school district by the superintendent of public instruction. 29. "Small school district" means a school district that meets all of the following: (a) Has a student count of fewer than six hundred in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or grades nine through twelve. (b) Contains at least one school that is fewer than thirty miles by the most reasonable route from another school that teaches one or more of the same grades and is operated by another school district in this state. (c) Is designated as a small school district by the superintendent of public instruction. 30. "Transportation revenue control limit" means the transportation revenue control limit computed as prescribed in section 15-946. 31. "Transportation support level" means the support level for pupil transportation operating expenses as provided in section 15-945. 32. "VI" means programs for pupils with visual impairments. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 15-945, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-945. Transportation support level A. The support level for to and from school for each school district for the current year shall be computed as follows: 1. Determine the approved daily route mileage of the school district for the fiscal year prior to the current year. 2. Multiply the figure obtained in paragraph 1 of this subsection by one hundred eighty, or for a school district that elects to provide at least two hundred days of instruction pursuant to section 15-902.04, multiply the figure obtained in paragraph 1 of this subsection by two hundred. 3. Determine the number of eligible students transported in the fiscal year prior to the current year. 4. Divide the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection by the amount determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection to determine the approved daily route mileage per eligible student transported. 5. Determine the classification in column 1 of this paragraph for the quotient determined in paragraph 4 of this subsection. Multiply the product obtained in paragraph 2 of this subsection by the corresponding state support level for each route mile as provided in column 2 of this paragraph. Column 1                                  Column 2 Approved Daily Route                      State Support Level per Mileage per Eligible                           Route Mile for Student Transported                       Fiscal Year 2025-2026 2026-2027 0.5 or less                                       3.01 3.07 More than 0.5 through 1.0                         2.47 2.52 More than 1.0                                     3.01 3.07 6. Add the amount spent during the prior fiscal year for bus tokens and bus passes for students who qualify as eligible students as defined in section 15-901. B. The support level for academic education, career and technical education, vocational education and athletic trips for each school district for the current year is computed as follows: 1. Determine the classification in column 1 of paragraph 2 of this subsection for the quotient determined in subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section. 2. Multiply the product obtained in subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section by the corresponding state support level for academic education, career and technical education, vocational education and athletic trips as provided in column 2, 3 or 4 of this paragraph, whichever is appropriate for the type of district. Column 1                  Column 2         Column 3         Column 4 Approved Daily Route Mileage per Eligible District Type   District Type    District Type Student Transported 02 or 03 04 05 0.5 or less 0.15            0.10             0.25 More than 0.5 through 1.0 0.15            0.10             0.25 More than 1.0 0.18            0.12             0.30 For the purposes of this paragraph, "district type 02" means a unified school district or an accommodation school that offers instruction in grades nine through twelve, "district type 03" means a common school district not within a high school district, "district type 04" means a common school district within a high school district or an accommodation school that does not offer instruction in grades nine through twelve and "district type 05" means a high school district. C. The support level for extended school year services for pupils with disabilities is computed as follows: 1. Determine the sum of the following: (a) The total number of miles driven by all buses of a school district while transporting eligible pupils with disabilities on scheduled routes from their residence to the school of attendance and from the school of attendance to their residence on routes for extended school year services in accordance with section 15-881. (b) The total number of miles driven on routes approved by the superintendent of public instruction for which a private party, a political subdivision or a common or a contract carrier is reimbursed for bringing an eligible pupil with a disability from the place of the pupil's residence to a school transportation pickup point or to the school facility of attendance and from the school transportation scheduled return point or from the school facility to the pupil's residence for extended school year services in accordance with section 15-881. 2. Multiply the sum determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection by the state support level for the district determined as provided in subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section. D. The transportation support level for each school district for the current year is the sum of the support level for to and from school as determined in subsection A of this section, the support level for academic education, career and technical education, vocational education and athletic trips as determined in subsection B of this section and the support level for extended school year services for pupils with disabilities as determined in subsection C of this section. E. The state support level for each approved route mile, as provided in subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section, shall be adjusted by the growth rate prescribed by law, subject to appropriation. F. School districts must provide the odometer reading for each bus as of the end of the current year and the total bus mileage during the current year. G. A school district may include route mileage and the number of riders to calculate funding pursuant to this section for transporting eligible students using motor vehicles described in section 15-925. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 15, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-1307, to read: START_STATUTE15-1307. Property proceeds fund; expenditure plan; review; requirements for disposition of school buildings and grounds A. The property proceeds fund is established consisting of the proceeds from the sale or lease of school buildings and grounds.  The schools shall administer the fund and, except as provided in subsection D of this section, shall deposit in the fund all monies that the schools receive for the sale or lease of school buildings and grounds on or after July 1, 2026.  Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations.  On notice from the schools, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. B. In any fiscal year in which the legislature appropriates monies from the property proceeds fund to the schools, the schools shall prepare an expenditure plan for the monies and shall submit the plan to the joint legislative budget committee for review. C. Before the schools may sell school buildings or grounds, the schools shall do all of the following: 1. Determine the appraised value of the school buildings or grounds by ordering independent appraisals from at least two different firms. The schools shall procure appraisal services pursuant to title 41, chapter 23 and shall award a contract for appraisal services to a firm only if the appraiser is well qualified and a designated member of a nationally recognized real estate appraisal association, institute or society.  The schools may use any appraisal that is ordered pursuant to this paragraph as the appraised value of the school buildings or grounds. 2. Submit a proposal to sell school buildings or grounds to the joint committee on capital review for review. 3. Sell the school buildings or grounds pursuant to section 37-803. D. The schools are not required to deposit monies in the property proceeds fund if the schools receive the monies for any of the following: 1. Fees, rentals and other charges for the use of school facilities for nonschool events as described in section 15-1323. 2. Proceeds from the lease of school buildings or grounds to a school. 3. Proceeds from the lease of school buildings or grounds for a period of less than one year.  A lease of school buildings or grounds for less than one year that includes an automatic lease renewal resulting in a total lease duration that exceeds one year is considered a lease for more than one year for the purposes of this paragraph. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 41-1276, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1276. Truth in taxation levy for equalization assistance to school districts A. On or before February 15 of each year, the joint legislative budget committee shall compute and transmit the truth in taxation rates for equalization assistance for school districts for the following fiscal year to: 1. The chairpersons of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees. 2. The chairpersons of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or their successor committees. B. The truth in taxation rates consist of the qualifying tax rate for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects pursuant to section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 1 and a qualifying tax rate for a unified district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects pursuant to section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2 that will offset the change in net assessed valuation of property that was subject to tax in the prior year. C. The joint legislative budget committee shall compute the truth in taxation rates as follows: 1. Determine the statewide net assessed value for the preceding tax year as provided in section 42-17151, subsection A, paragraph 3. 2. Determine the statewide net assessed value for the current tax year, excluding the net assessed value of property that was not subject to tax in the preceding year. 3. Divide the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection by the amount determined in paragraph 2 of this subsection. 4. Adjust the qualifying tax rates for the current fiscal year by the percentage determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection in order to offset the change in net assessed value. D. Except as provided in subsections E and G of this section, the qualifying tax rate for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects and the qualifying tax rate for a unified school district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects for the following fiscal year shall be the rate determined by the joint legislative budget committee pursuant to subsection C of this section. The committee shall transmit the rates to the superintendent of public instruction and the county boards of supervisors by March 15 of each year. E. If the legislature proposes qualifying tax rates that exceed the truth in taxation rate: 1. The house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing on or before February 28 and publish a notice of a truth in taxation hearing subject to the following requirements: (a) The notice shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in this state that is published at the state capital. The first publication shall be at least fourteen but not more than twenty days before the date of the hearing.  The second publication shall be at least seven but not more than ten days before the date of the hearing. (b) The notice shall be published in a location other than the classified or legal advertising section of the newspaper. (c) The notice shall be at least one-fourth page in size and shall be surrounded by a solid black border at least one-eighth inch in width. (d) The notice shall be in the following form, with the "truth in taxation hearing  notice of tax increase" headline in at least eighteen-point type: Truth in Taxation Hearing Notice of Tax Increase In compliance with section 41-1276, Arizona Revised Statutes, the state legislature is notifying property taxpayers in Arizona of the legislature's intention to raise the property tax levy over last year's level. The proposed tax increase will cause the taxes on a $100,000 home to be $(total proposed taxes including the tax increase). Without the proposed tax increase, the total taxes that would be owed on a $100,000 home would have been $_______. All interested citizens are invited to attend a public hearing on the tax increase that is scheduled to be held (date and time) at (location). (e) For the purposes of computing the tax increase on a $100,000 home as required by the notice, the joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall consider the difference between the truth in taxation rate and the proposed increased rate. 2. The joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall consider any motion to recommend the proposed tax rates to the full legislature by roll call vote. F. In addition to publishing the truth in taxation notice under subsection E, paragraph 1 of this section, the joint meeting of the house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate finance committee, or their successor committees, shall issue a press release containing the truth in taxation notice. G. Notwithstanding any other law, the legislature shall not adopt a state budget that provides for qualifying tax rates pursuant to section 15-971 that exceed the truth in taxation rates computed pursuant to subsection A of this section unless the rates are adopted by a concurrent resolution approved by an affirmative roll call vote of two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature before the legislature enacts the general appropriations bill. If the resolution is not approved by two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature, the rates for the following fiscal year shall be the truth in taxation rates determined pursuant to subsection C of this section and shall be transmitted to the superintendent of public instruction and the county boards of supervisors. H. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section and if approved by the qualified electors voting at a statewide general election, the legislature shall not set a qualifying tax rate that exceeds $2.1265 for a common or high school district or $4.253 for a unified school district. The legislature shall not set a county equalization assistance for education rate that exceeds $0.5123. I. Pursuant to subsection C of this section, the qualifying tax rate in tax year 2025 2026 for a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that does not offer instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447 is $1.5606 $1.5128 and for a unified school district, a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447 is $3.1212 $3.0256. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Failing schools tutoring fund; use of monies; fiscal year 2026-2027; report A. Notwithstanding section 15-241, Arizona Revised Statutes, the department of education may use monies in the failing schools tutoring fund established by section 15-241, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 for the following school improvements: 1. To provide assistance to school districts and charter schools for professional development and coaching for teachers and principals. 2. To monitor the progress of school districts and charter schools toward improved academic outcomes. 3. Outreach to ensure that schools and parents have access to tutoring opportunities. B. On or before September 1, 2026, the department of education shall report the proposed expenditures for fiscal year 2026-2027 pursuant to subsection A of this section to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the director of the joint legislative budget committee and the director of the governor's office of strategic planning and budgeting. Sec. 7. Child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program; contract; provider; curriculum development; posting requirements; distribution of materials to new parents by the department of health services; reporting requirements; delayed repeal; definitions A. The child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program is established in the department of education.  On or before July 1, 2027, the department of education shall allow public schools to apply to participate in the pilot program and shall select six public schools from the applicants to participate in the pilot program during the 2027-2028 school year.  The department of education shall consult with the department of child safety and organizations that are operated by survivors of grooming or human trafficking in developing the pilot program established by this subsection and the curriculum developed pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 3 of this section. The pilot program must include: 1. For teachers, at least four hours of in-person, evidence-based instructional modules that are provided by an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section and that may include the following: (a) Training regarding the prevention and identification of, and responses to, child sexual abuse and assault, including exploitation, grooming, grooming with the intent to exploit and technology-facilitated abuse. (b) Resources to further student, teacher and parental awareness and prevention of child sexual abuse and assault, including exploitation, grooming, grooming with the intent to exploit and technology-facilitated abuse. 2. For the parents of students who are enrolled in the participating schools, at least three hours of in-person, evidence-based instruction provided by an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section and age-appropriate educational materials that are designed for children in kindergarten programs or any of grades one through twelve regarding child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention, including exploitation, grooming behaviors and grooming with the intent to exploit. The evidence-based instruction that an organization provides to the parents of students who are enrolled in the participating school pursuant to this paragraph may include instruction in: (a) Skills to recognize the following: (i) Child sexual abuse and assault. (ii) Boundary violations and unwanted forms of contact. (iii) Grooming behaviors, including manipulation, trust building, secrecy, desensitization and isolation. (iv) Exploitation and grooming with the intent to exploit, including online grooming, sextortion and technology-facilitated exploitation. (v) Patterns, tactics and warning signs associated with grooming and exploitation. (b) Strategies that: (i) Promote disclosure. (ii) Reduce self-blame. (iii) Mobilize bystanders. 3. A uniform child sexual abuse and assault response policy and reporting procedure that is based on best practices and that may include: (a) Actions that victims of child sexual abuse and assault may take to obtain assistance. (b) Intervention and counseling options for victims of child sexual abuse and assault. (c) Access to educational resources to enable victims of child sexual abuse and assault to succeed in school. (d) Uniform procedures for reporting instances of child sexual abuse and assault to school staff members. (e) Uniform procedures for notifying the parents of any student who is a victim of an incident that involves child sexual abuse, child sexual assault, grooming, exploitation, grooming with the intent to exploit or technology-facilitated abuse not later than twenty-four hours after any school personnel become aware of the incident. B. The department of education: 1. May contract with a provider to implement the pilot program established by subsection A of this section if the provider demonstrates that the provider is able to meet all of the requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section. 2. Shall select one or more organizations to provide the instructional modules for teachers pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section or the instruction for the parents of students pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, or both.  The department of education shall select an organization pursuant to this paragraph only if the organization meets both of the following: (a) Is organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, promoting grooming awareness or preventing human trafficking. (b) Ensures that the individuals who will provide instruction to teachers and parents of students are either qualified survivors of grooming or human trafficking or advocates who have direct expertise in child sexual abuse, grooming and human trafficking prevention. 3. Beginning on the effective date of this section, shall gather stakeholder input to develop a curriculum for the pilot program, including scheduling stakeholder meetings, subject to the following: (a) The department of education shall solicit input from representatives of each of the following: (i) The department of child safety. (ii) Organizations that are organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, grooming or human trafficking. (iii) Survivors of child sexual abuse, grooming and human trafficking. (b) The department of education shall select an organization to develop the curriculum for the pilot program, coordinate stakeholder input and ensure that the curriculum is survivor-informed and prevention-focused. The department of education shall select an organization that both: (i) Is organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, grooming or human trafficking. (ii) Demonstrates that the organization has experience providing survivor-informed prevention education. (c) The curriculum developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph is subject to approval by the state board of education and the department of education. 4. Shall make the educational materials described in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section available to the public on the department of education's website and provide the webpage address for the educational materials to each participating school and to the director of the department of health services. 5. Shall select an organization to provide by mail a printed copy of the educational materials described in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section on receipt of any request that is submitted pursuant to subsection C, paragraph 2, subdivision (b) of this section.  If sufficient monies are available, the department of education may reimburse the organization that is selected pursuant to this paragraph for the actual costs of providing printed copies of the educational materials to the parents of students. C. A public school that participates in the pilot program established by subsection A of this section: 1. May not require any parent to participate in the pilot program. 2. On enrollment of a student, shall provide to the student's parent both: (a) The webpage address described in subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section. (b) An opportunity to request a printed copy of the educational materials described in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section. If a student's parent requests a printed copy of the educational materials pursuant to this subdivision and authorizes the school to disclose the parent's address, the school shall submit the request and address to the organization that is selected by the department of education pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section, and the organization shall mail a printed copy of the educational materials to the student's parent. D. On or before October 1, 2028, each public school that participates in the pilot program established by subsection A of this section shall submit a report to the department of education and a copy of the report to the department of child safety that includes all of the following: 1. The number of parents who received evidence-based instruction through the pilot program, together with the number of hours of instruction that the organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section provided. 2. The number of teachers who completed the evidence-based instructional modules provided through the pilot program. 3. Any testimony or comments from teachers or the parents of students relating to the pilot program. 4. Whether the school intends to continue providing instructional modules to teachers or instruction to the parents of students, or both, through an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section in subsequent school years. E. The department of health services shall include in the educational materials and information that is compiled and provided to new parents pursuant to section 36-503.04, Arizona Revised Statutes, the webpage address described in subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Grooming" means a pattern of conduct used to gain a minor's trust, desensitize the minor to inappropriate conduct and facilitate exploitation. 2. "Exploitation" means the manipulation, abuse or use of a minor for sexual purposes, sexual conduct, sexual trafficking, sexual extortion or other sexual abuse. F. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2028. Sec. 8. Department of education; state aid; fiscal year 2024-2025 recalculation; fiscal year 2026-2027 increase; delayed repeal A. Notwithstanding section 15-915, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the department of education shall recalculate the state aid for the Alhambra elementary school district in fiscal year 2024-2025 as the result of a change in the assessed valuation of property within the school district and shall increase the state aid for the Alhambra elementary school district in fiscal year 2026-2027 by $852,200. B. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. Sec. 9. Intent The governor and the legislature intend that school districts increase the total percentage of classroom spending over the previous year's percentages in the combined categories of instruction, student support and instructional support as prescribed by the auditor general. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 13, 2026.